test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-teatt_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - teâtt â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     teâtt+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: teâtt
     teâtt+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: teâđ
     teâtt+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: teâđ
     teâtt+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: tiõtˈtu
     teâtt+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: teâđast
     teâtt+N+Sg+Com+Indef: teâđain
     teâtt+N+Ess+Indef: teâttan
     teâtt+N+Par+Indef: teâttad
     teâtt+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [teâđtaa, teâđtää]
     teâtt+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: teâđ
     teâtt+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: teâđai
     teâtt+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: teâđaid
     teâtt+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: teâđaid
     teâtt+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: teâđain
     teâtt+N+Pl+Com+Indef: teâđaivuiʹm
     teâtt+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [teâđaitaa, teâđaitää]
